Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5677.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER VIA MICHIGAN PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION Sec. 87. (1) An individual is not eligible to be a member of the Michigan public service commission unless the individual meets all of the following requirements as provided under section 1 of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.1, by the filing deadline: (a) Is a citizen of the United States. (b) Is a resident of this state. (c) Is not pecuniarily interested in any public utility or person subject to the jurisdiction and control of the Michigan public service commission. (2) In addition to the requirements under subsection (1), an individual may not be elected as a member of the Michigan public service commission for terms or partial terms that combined total more than 12 years. Sec. 87a. At its 2028 fall state convention and every 2 years thereafter, each political party may nominate candidates for membership on the Michigan public service commission. Sec. 87b. Not more than 24 hours after the conclusion of the fall state convention, the state central committee of each political party shall canvass the proceedings of the convention and determine the nominees of the convention for membership on the Michigan public service commission. Not more than 1 business day after the conclusion of the state convention, the chairperson and secretary of the state central committee shall forward to the secretary of state a typewritten or printed list of the names and residence, including street address if known, of the candidates nominated at the convention for membership on the Michigan public service commission. The secretary of state shall forward a copy of the list received under this section to the board of election commissioners of each county, in care of the county clerk at the county seat. The name of each nominee on the list must be printed on the nonpartisan portion of the ballot containing no party designation. Sec. 87c. (1) An individual who is certified by the state central committee of a political party as nominated for membership on the Michigan public service commission may withdraw by filing a written notice of withdrawal with the secretary of state or the secretary of state's duly authorized agent and a copy with the chairperson and the secretary of the state central committee of the political party not later than 4 p.m. of the fourth business day following the conclusion of the convention at which the individual was nominated. (2) If a candidate of a political party, after having been nominated to membership on the Michigan public service commission dies, withdraws, moves from this state, or becomes disqualified for any reason, the state central committee of the political party shall meet forthwith and, by a majority vote of the members of the state central committee, shall select a candidate to fill the vacancy. The name of the candidate selected must be immediately certified by the chairperson and the secretary of the committee to the secretary of state and to the board of election commissioners for each county whose duty it is to prepare the official ballots. The board shall cause to be printed or placed on the ballots, in the proper place, the name of the candidate selected to fill the vacancy. Sec. 87d. (1) At the 2028 general November election, 3 members of the Michigan public service commission shall be elected for 4-year terms of office and 2 members of the Michigan public service commission shall be elected for 2-year terms of office. (2) At the 2030 general November election, and every 2 years thereafter, members of the Michigan public service commission shall be elected for 4-year terms of office. Sec. 87e. The board of state canvassers shall determine which candidates for membership on the Michigan public service commission have received the greatest number of votes and shall declare those candidates to be elected. The board of state canvassers shall make and subscribe on its statement of returns a certificate of the determination and deliver the certificate to the secretary of state. Sec. 87f. The secretary of state shall file and preserve the original statement and determination of the board of state canvassers of the result of the election and shall execute and cause to be delivered to the individuals declared elected to be members of the Michigan public service commission a certificate of election, certified by the secretary of state under the great seal of this state. Sec. 87g. The term of office begins on January 1 following the election and continues until a successor is elected and qualified. Sec. 87h. An individual elected as a member of the Michigan public service commission, before entering the duties of the office, must take and subscribe to the oath as provided in section 1 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963 and deposit the oath with the secretary of state. Sec. 87i. An individual elected as a member of the Michigan public service commission who desires to resign must file a written notice containing the effective date of the resignation with the governor and a copy with the secretary of state. Sec. 87j. The office of member of the Michigan public service commission becomes vacant on the happening of any of the following events: (a) The member's death. (b) The member's resignation. (c) The member's removal from office for cause. (d) The member's ceasing to be a resident of this state. (e) The member's conviction of an infamous crime or an offense involving the violation of the member's oath of office. (f) The decision of a competent tribunal declaring the member's election or appointment void. (g) The member's refusal or neglect to take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and deposit the oath of office in the manner and within the time prescribed by law. (h) The member serves as an officer or committee member of any political party organization. (i) The member holds any other office in this state. (j) The member is employed by any other commission, board, department, or institution in this state. (k) The member is retained or employed by any public utility or person subject to the jurisdiction and control of the Michigan public service commission. (l) If a member of the State Bar of Michigan, the member practices law or acts as counselor or attorney in any court in this state. Sec. 87k. An individual elected as a member of the Michigan public service commission may be removed from office by the legislature as provided in section 2 of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.2. Sec. 87l. (1) If a vacancy occurs in the elective office of member of the Michigan public service commission before the state convention of each political party held in the spring of an odd numbered year, the state central committee of each political party shall nominate at that state convention a candidate for membership on the Michigan public service commission to fill the vacancy. Not more than 24 hours after the conclusion of that state convention, the state central committee shall determine the nominee from that state convention for membership on the Michigan public service commission. Not more than 1 business day after the conclusion of that state convention, the chairperson and secretary of the state central committee shall forward to the secretary of state the name and residence, including street address if known, of the candidate nominated at the state convention for membership on the Michigan public service commission to fill the vacancy. The secretary of state shall forward the name and address of that candidate to the board of election commissioners of each county, in care of the county clerk at the county seat. The name of the nominee must be printed on the nonpartisan portion of the ballot containing no party designation at the next May regular election held after that state convention in the spring of an odd numbered year. (2) If a vacancy occurs in the elective office of member of the Michigan public service commission after the state convention of each political party held in the spring of an odd numbered year, and before the state convention of each political party held in the fall of an odd numbered year, the state central committee of each political party shall nominate at that state convention a candidate for membership on the Michigan public service commission to fill the vacancy. Not more than 24 hours after the conclusion of that state convention, the state central committee shall determine the nominee for membership on the Michigan public service commission. Not more than 1 business day after the conclusion of that state convention, the chairperson and secretary of the state central committee shall forward to the secretary of state the name and residence, including street address if known, of the candidate nominated at the state convention for membership on the Michigan public service commission to fill the vacancy. The secretary of state shall forward the name and address of that candidate to the board of election commissioners of each county, in care of the county clerk at the county seat. The name of the nominee must be printed on the nonpartisan portion of the ballot containing no party designation at the general November election held after that state convention in the fall of an odd numbered year. (3) If a vacancy occurs in the elective office of member of the Michigan public service commission before the state convention of each political party held in the spring of an even numbered year, the state central committee of each political party shall nominate at that state convention a candidate for membership on the Michigan public service commission to fill the vacancy. Not more than 24 hours after the conclusion of that state convention, the state central committee shall determine the nominee from that state convention for membership on the Michigan public service commission. Not more than 1 business day after the conclusion of that state convention, the chairperson and secretary of the state central committee shall forward to the secretary of state the name and residence, including street address if known, of the candidate nominated at the state convention for membership on the Michigan public service commission to fill the vacancy. The secretary of state shall forward the name and address of that candidate to the board of election commissioners of each county, in care of the county clerk at the county seat. The name of the nominee must be printed on the nonpartisan portion of the ballot containing no party designation at the next May regular election held after that state convention in the spring of an even numbered year. (4) If a vacancy occurs in the elective office of member of the Michigan public service commission after the state convention of each political party held in the spring of an even numbered year, and before the state convention of each political party held in the fall of an even numbered year, the state central committee of each political party shall nominate at that state convention a candidate for membership on the Michigan public service commission to fill the vacancy. Not more than 24 hours after the conclusion of that state convention, the state central committee shall determine the nominee for membership on the Michigan public service commission. Not more than 1 business day after the conclusion of that state convention, the chairperson and secretary of the state central committee shall forward to the secretary of state the name and residence, including street address if known, of the candidate nominated at the state convention for membership on the Michigan public service commission to fill the vacancy. The secretary of state shall forward the name and address of that candidate to the board of election commissioners of each county, in care of the county clerk at the county seat. The name of the nominee must be printed on the nonpartisan portion of the ballot containing no party designation at the general November election held after that state convention in the fall of an even numbered year. (5) An individual elected to fill a vacancy as provided in this section shall take and subscribe to the oath as provided in section 1 of article XI of the state constitution of 1963 and hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term and until a successor is elected and qualified. Sec. 87m. The votes cast for any candidate for member of the Michigan public service commission at any election are subject to recount as provided in chapter XXXIII. Sec. 87n. An individual elected as a member of the Michigan public service commission is subject to recall as provided in chapter XXXVI. Sec. 699. At any regular election, the names of the several nonpartisan offices to be voted for shall must be placed on a separate portion of the ballot containing no party designation in the following order: members of the Michigan public service commission, justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the circuit court, judges of the probate court, judges of the district court, community college board of trustees member, intermediate school district board member, city officers, the following village officers in substantially the following order in the year in which elections for the offices are held: president, clerk, treasurer, and trustees, and in a year in which an election for the office is held, local school district board member, metropolitan district officer, and district library board member. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5676 (request no. H05541'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.